Utah statutes.
77-16a-303.   Court determinations.
After entry of judgment of not guilty by reason of insanity, the court shall:
(1)  determine on the record the offense of which the person otherwise would
have been convicted and the maximum sentence he could have received; and
(2)  make specific findings regarding whether there is a victim of the crime
for which the defendant has been found not guilty by reason of insanity and,
if so, whether the victim wishes to be notified of any conditional release,
discharge, or escape of the defendant.
